Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-207
Jail, defined.

For the purposes of Chapter 47, article 2, jail shall be defined to include a jail, house of correction, community residential center, work release center, halfway house, or other place of confinement of a person committed by any lawful authority to any suitable and appropriate residence, facility, center, or institution designated as a jail facility by the city.

Laws 1979, LB 315, § 4.